District of Columbia statutes.
1-307.06

Rulemaking authority.

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], shall issue rules to implement the provisions of § 1-307.03, § 1-307.05, and this section.

Oct. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 13-38, § 2204, 46 DCR 6373
This section is referenced in § 1-307.03.
1981 Ed., § 1-360.3.
For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see § 2204 of the Service Improvement and Fiscal Year 2000 Budget Support Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-110, July 28, 1999, 46 DCR 6320).
Delegation of Authority Pursuant to D.C. Law 13-38, the Medical Assistance Expansion Program Act of 1999, see Mayor’s Order 2001-83, June 7, 2001 ( 48 DCR 5839).